New York, session 2025-2026, A10462.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 6-112.1 to read as follows: 3 § 6-112.1 Use of unauthorized contractors. Any person who submits a 4 claim for and receives payment in excess of one hundred thousand dollars 5 for a subcontractor not pre-authorized by the agency as required by the 6 contract, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not 7 less than one thousand dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand 8 dollars, by imprisonment for a period not exceeding six months, or both; 9 and the person on whose behalf such false, deceptive, or fraudulent 10 representation was made, shall thenceforth be disqualified from bidding 11 on any contracts for the city. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15037-01-6